Nebraska, session 109, LB126.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 10-126, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
10-126 (1) All bonds of indebtedness, issued after September 7, 1947, by
any county, precinct, city, village, school district, drainage district, or
irrigation district or any other municipal corporation or governmental
subdivision of the state shall be redeemable at the option of the governmental
subdivision or municipal corporation issuing such bonds at any time on or after
five years from the date of issuance, except that this provision shall not
apply to (a) bonds of public power districts, public power and irrigation
districts, metropolitan utilities districts, cities of the metropolitan and
primary classes, and housing authorities of any city or village, (b) issues of
revenue bonds exceeding one million dollars of cities of the first and second
classes and of villages, (c) issues of bonds exceeding ten million dollars of
any school district of one thousand or more students in membership as provided
in the fall school district membership report pursuant to subsection (4) of
section 79-528 immediately preceding the issuance of bonds, or (d) bonds issued
by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska or the Board of Trustees
of the Nebraska State Colleges, or (e) bonds of counties sold to an
underwriting firm pursuant to a competitive sale, including the method of sale
described in section 10-145. Bonds of a district created under Chapter 31 or 39
shall in addition, after annexation of the district by any municipality, be
redeemable at the option of the annexing municipality at any time after
annexation of such district if at the time of redemption at least five years
have elapsed from date of issuance. Such condition shall be plainly set forth
in all bonds of any governmental subdivision of the state or municipal
corporation hereafter issued to which it applies.
(2) The issuer, except districts organized under Chapter 31 or 39, of any
such bonds of indebtedness, when the total amount of bonds at par value
authorized as a single issue is five hundred thousand dollars or more, may
agree to pay a call premium of not to exceed four percent of the par value for
the redemption of such bonds. Districts organized under Chapter 31 or 39 may
agree to pay a call premium of not to exceed two percent of the par value of
such bonds when a single issue is five hundred thousand dollars or more, and
bonds of such districts shall have no other bond redemption call or prepayment
restrictions except as provided in this section. Bonds listed in subdivisions
(1)(a) through (1)(d) of this section may contain such provisions with respect
to their redemption as the public power district, public power and irrigation
district, metropolitan utilities district, city, village, housing authority,
school district, Board of Regents, or Board of Trustees shall provide.
(3) All bonds issued which do not provide a special procedure for calling
and prepayments may shall be called by a resolution or ordinance passed by the
governing body of the obligor, which resolution or ordinance may condition such
call for redemption upon the issuance of refunding bonds of the obligor for
such redemption or a similar event which produces funds necessary for such
prepayment shall designate the bond or bonds to be prepaid by stating the date
of the bonds, the purpose for which the bonds were issued, the bond numbers of
the bonds so called, and the date set for prepayment. The issuer of any bonds
which are required by this section to be issued subject to an option of
redemption shall, at least thirty days prior to the date set for prepayment of
such bonds, send notice by mail of the call to each holder of the called bonds
as shown in its records. A true copy of the resolution shall be filed by the
obligor with the paying agent on or before the call date.
(4) If the obligor deposits sufficient funds with the paying agent to pay
the called bonds and accrued interest to date of call in full on or before the
call date, the bonds shall cease to be a liability of the obligor, otherwise
the call shall be revoked, and the bonds continue in effect the same as though
no call had been made.
Sec. 2. Original section 10-126, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
repealed.
-1-